bg/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/bg.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY аеониртвсклмпздяубъгчцжхшфйщюьАЕОНИРТВСКЛМПЗДЯУБЪГЧЦЖХШФЙЩЮЬ

SFX A Y 8
SFX A   0         а         .
SFX A   0         ата       .
SFX A   0         и         .
SFX A   0         ите       .
SFX A   0         ия        .
SFX A   0         ият       .
SFX A   0         о         .
SFX A   0         ото       .

SFX B Y 3
SFX B   0         и         .
SFX B   0         ите       .
SFX B   0         та        .

SFX C Y 4
SFX C   0         а         .
SFX C   0         и         .
SFX C   0         ите       .
SFX C   0         ът        .

SFX D Y 4
SFX D   0         а         .
SFX D   0         ове       .
SFX D   0         овете     .
SFX D   0         ът        .

SFX E Y 5
SFX E   0         и         .
SFX E   0         ите       .
SFX E   0         ю         .
SFX E   0         я         .
SFX E   0         ят        .

SFX F Y 5
SFX F   0         а         .
SFX F   0         е         .
SFX F   0         и         .
SFX F   0         ите       .
SFX F   0         ът        .

SFX G Y 5
SFX G   0         а         .
SFX G   0         и         .
SFX G   0         ите       .
SFX G   0         о         .
SFX G   0         ът        .

SFX H Y 4
SFX H   0         и         .
SFX H   0         ите       .
SFX H   0         я         .
SFX H   0         ят        .

SFX I Y 2
SFX I   0         а         .
SFX I   0         ът        .

SFX J Y 3
SFX J   0         та        .
SFX J   0         тата      .
SFX J   0         то        .

SFX K Y 25
SFX K   а         ата       а
SFX K   а         и         а
SFX K   а         ите       а
SFX K   г         га        г
SFX K   г         гът       г
SFX K   г         зи        г
SFX K   г         зите      г
SFX K   ен        на        ен
SFX K   ен        ната      ен
SFX K   ен        ни        ен
SFX K   ен        ните      ен
SFX K   ен        ния       ен
SFX K   ен        ният      ен
SFX K   ен        но        ен
SFX K   ен        ното      ен
SFX K   и         а         и
SFX K   и         ата       и
SFX K   и         ите       и
SFX K   и         ия        и
SFX K   и         ият       и
SFX K   и         о         и
SFX K   и         ото       и
SFX K   я         и         я
SFX K   я         ите       я
SFX K   я         ята       я

SFX L Y 133
SFX L   а         ата       а
SFX L   а         и         а
SFX L   а         ите       а
SFX L   е         ето       е
SFX L   е         я         е
SFX L   е         ята       е
SFX L   ен        йна       ен
SFX L   ен        йната     ен
SFX L   ен        йни       ен
SFX L   ен        йните     ен
SFX L   ен        йния      ен
SFX L   ен        йният     ен
SFX L   ен        йно       ен
SFX L   ен        йното     ен
SFX L   ец        еца       ец
SFX L   ец        ецо       ец
SFX L   ец        ецът      ец
SFX L   ец        ци        ец
SFX L   ец        ците      ец
SFX L   и         а         и
SFX L   и         ата       и
SFX L   и         ите       и
SFX L   и         ия        и
SFX L   и         ият       и
SFX L   и         о         и
SFX L   и         ото       и
SFX L   о         а         о
SFX L   о         ата       о
SFX L   о         ото       о
SFX L   ъв        ва        ъв
SFX L   ъв        вата      ъв
SFX L   ъв        ви        ъв
SFX L   ъв        вите      ъв
SFX L   ъв        вия       ъв
SFX L   ъв        вият      ъв
SFX L   ъв        во        ъв
SFX L   ъв        вото      ъв
SFX L   ъг        га        ъг
SFX L   ъг        гата      ъг
SFX L   ъг        ги        ъг
SFX L   ъг        гите      ъг
SFX L   ъг        гия       ъг
SFX L   ъг        гият      ъг
SFX L   ъг        го        ъг
SFX L   ъг        гото      ъг
SFX L   ък        ка        ък
SFX L   ък        ката      ък
SFX L   ък        ки        ък
SFX L   ък        ките      ък
SFX L   ък        кия       ък
SFX L   ък        кият      ък
SFX L   ък        ко        ък
SFX L   ък        кото      ък
SFX L   ъл        ла        ъл
SFX L   ъл        лата      ъл
SFX L   ъл        ли        ъл
SFX L   ъл        лите      ъл
SFX L   ъл        лия       ъл
SFX L   ъл        лият      ъл
SFX L   ъл        ло        ъл
SFX L   ъл        лото      ъл
SFX L   ър        ра        ър
SFX L   ър        рата      ър
SFX L   ър        ри        ър
SFX L   ър        рите      ър
SFX L   ър        рия       ър
SFX L   ър        рият      ър
SFX L   ър        ро        ър
SFX L   ър        рото      ър
SFX L   ъш        ша        ъш
SFX L   ъш        шата      ъш
SFX L   ъш        ши        ъш
SFX L   ъш        шите      ъш
SFX L   ъш        шия       ъш
SFX L   ъш        шият      ъш
SFX L   ъш        шо        ъш
SFX L   ъш        шото      ъш
SFX L   яв        еви       яв
SFX L   яв        евите     яв
SFX L   яв        евия      яв
SFX L   яв        евият     яв
SFX L   яв        ява       яв
SFX L   яв        явата     яв
SFX L   яв        яво       яв
SFX L   яв        явото     яв
SFX L   як        еки       як
SFX L   як        еките     як
SFX L   як        екия      як
SFX L   як        екият     як
SFX L   як        яка       як
SFX L   як        яката     як
SFX L   як        яко       як
SFX L   як        якото     як
SFX L   ял        ели       ял
SFX L   ял        елите     ял
SFX L   ял        елия      ял
SFX L   ял        елият     ял
SFX L   ял        яла       ял
SFX L   ял        ялата     ял
SFX L   ял        яло       ял
SFX L   ял        ялото     ял
SFX L   ям        еми       ям
SFX L   ям        емите     ям
SFX L   ям        емия      ям
SFX L   ям        емият     ям
SFX L   ям        яма       ям
SFX L   ям        ямата     ям
SFX L   ям        ямо       ям
SFX L   ям        ямото     ям
SFX L   ян        ени       ян
SFX L   ян        ените     ян
SFX L   ян        ения      ян
SFX L   ян        еният     ян
SFX L   ян        яна       ян
SFX L   ян        яната     ян
SFX L   ян        яно       ян
SFX L   ян        яното     ян
SFX L   яп        епи       яп
SFX L   яп        епите     яп
SFX L   яп        епия      яп
SFX L   яп        епият     яп
SFX L   яп        япа       яп
SFX L   яп        япата     яп
SFX L   яп        япо       яп
SFX L   яп        япото     яп
SFX L   ят        ети       ят
SFX L   ят        етите     ят
SFX L   ят        етия      ят
SFX L   ят        етият     ят
SFX L   ят        ята       ят
SFX L   ят        ятата     ят
SFX L   ят        ято       ят
SFX L   ят        ятото     ят

SFX M Y 29
SFX M   е         а         е
SFX M   е         ата       е
SFX M   е         ето       е
SFX M   ец        еца       ец
SFX M   ец        ецо       ец
SFX M   ец        ецът      ец
SFX M   ец        йци       ец
SFX M   ец        йците     ец
SFX M   ин        и         ин
SFX M   ин        ина       ин
SFX M   ин        ино       ин
SFX M   ин        инът      ин
SFX M   ин        ите       ин
SFX M   й         и         й
SFX M   й         ите       й
SFX M   й         ю         й
SFX M   й         я         й
SFX M   й         ят        й
SFX M   о         и         о
SFX M   о         ите       о
SFX M   о         ото       о
SFX M   ъм        ма        ъм
SFX M   ъм        ми        ъм
SFX M   ъм        мите      ъм
SFX M   ъм        мът       ъм
SFX M   ъм        ъма       ъм
SFX M   я         и         я
SFX M   я         ите       я
SFX M   я         ята       я

SFX N Y 20
SFX N   ел        ела       ел
SFX N   ел        елът      ел
SFX N   ел        ли        ел
SFX N   ел        лите      ел
SFX N   ец        еца       ец
SFX N   ец        ецът      ец
SFX N   ец        ци        ец
SFX N   ец        ците      ец
SFX N   ъл        ли        ъл
SFX N   ъл        лите      ъл
SFX N   ъл        ъла       ъл
SFX N   ъл        ълът      ъл
SFX N   ъм        ми        ъм
SFX N   ъм        мите      ъм
SFX N   ъм        ъма       ъм
SFX N   ъм        ъмът      ъм
SFX N   ър        ри        ър
SFX N   ър        рите      ър
SFX N   ър        ъра       ър
SFX N   ър        ърът      ър

SFX O Y 18
SFX O   0         вци       .
SFX O   0         вците     .
SFX O   0         то        .
SFX O   е         ето       е
SFX O   е         ия        е
SFX O   е         ията      е
SFX O   й         и         й
SFX O   й         ите       й
SFX O   й         я         й
SFX O   й         ят        й
SFX O   к         ка        к
SFX O   к         кът       к
SFX O   к         ци        к
SFX O   к         ците      к
SFX O   х         си        х
SFX O   х         сите      х
SFX O   х         ха        х
SFX O   х         хът       х

SFX X Y 38
SFX X   м         дат       м
SFX X   м         де        м
SFX X   м         дели      м
SFX X   м         дем       м
SFX X   м         ден       м
SFX X   м         дена      м
SFX X   м         дената    м
SFX X   м         дени      м
SFX X   м         дените    м
SFX X   м         дения     м
SFX X   м         деният    м
SFX X   м         дено      м
SFX X   м         деното    м
SFX X   м         дете      м
SFX X   м         деш       м
SFX X   м         деше      м
SFX X   м         дох       м
SFX X   м         доха      м
SFX X   м         дохме     м
SFX X   м         дохте     м
SFX X   м         дял       м
SFX X   м         дяла      м
SFX X   м         дяло      м
SFX X   м         дях       м
SFX X   м         дяха      м
SFX X   м         дяхме     м
SFX X   м         дяхте     м
SFX X   м         й         м
SFX X   м         йте       м
SFX X   м         л         м
SFX X   м         ла        м
SFX X   м         лата      м
SFX X   м         ли        м
SFX X   м         лите      м
SFX X   м         лия       м
SFX X   м         лият      м
SFX X   м         ло        м
SFX X   м         лото      м

MAP 28
MAP аъьa
MAP еиeu
MAP оуoy
MAP бпn6
MAP вф
MAP гкk
MAP дтg
MAP жш6
MAP зс3
MAP pр
MAP cс
MAP xх
MAP ч4
MAP АЪЬA
MAP ЕИE
MAP ОУO0
MAP БП6
MAP ВФB
MAP ГКK
MAP ДТT
MAP ЖШ6
MAP ЗС3C
MAP MМ
MAP HН
MAP PР
MAP YУ
MAP XХ
MAP Ч4

REP 16
REP сх ш
REP зх ж
REP тз ц
REP тс ц
REP ц тс
REP шт щ
REP щ шт
REP ща шата
REP ще шите
REP що шето
REP йу ю
REP ьу ю
REP йа я
REP йъ я
REP ьа я
REP ьъ я
